District of Columbia statutes.
44-1901

Repealed

Legislative findings; purpose of chapter.

Repealed.

May 13, 1977, D.C. Law 1-134, title I, § 101, 24 DCR 406
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 402, 43 DCR 4962
1981 Ed., § 32-201.
1973 Ed., § 32-1301.
For temporary repeal of this chapter, consisting of §§ 32-201 through 32-257 1981 Ed., see § 402 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-388, August 28, 1996, 43 DCR 4937), § 402 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-421, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6093), § 402 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-487, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 634), and see § 402 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-39, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2044).
For temporary delay of the effective date of § 402 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Emergency Act of 1996, see § 501(c) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-388, August 28, 1996, 43 DCR 4937), and § 501(c) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-421, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6093), and § 501(c) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-487, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 634).
Section 501(c) of D.C. Law 11-212 provided that § 402 of the act shall become effective upon the first meeting of the Board pursuant to § 44-1102.04(h).

D.C. Law 1-134, title I, § 101, eff. May 13, 1977, added §§ 32-201 and 32-202 [1981 Ed.].

D.C. Law 11-212, title IV, § 402 ( 43 DCR 4962), eff. April 9, 1997, provided: “The D.C. General Hospital Commission Act, effective May 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-134; D.C. Code § 32-201 et seq.) [1981 Ed.], is repealed.”

Title V, § 501(c) of D.C. Law 11-212, provided: “(c) Section 402 shall become effective upon the first meeting of the Board pursuant to section 204(h).”